Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Article 4. General Provisions.

Collateral references. —

78 Am. Jur. 2d, Waters, § 1 et seq.

93 C.J.S., Waters, § 1 et seq.

Sec. 46.15.250.
Enforcement authority.

The following persons are peace officers of the state and they shall enforce this chapter:

a state employee authorized by the commissioner;

a police officer of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 50 SLA 1966)

Administrative Code. —

For critical water management areas, see 11 AAC 93, art. 9.

Sec. 46.15.255.
Enforcement and costs.

In addition to a penalty imposed under AS

46.15.180

for violation of an order issued under this chapter, the commissioner may

remove or abate unpermitted works of appropriation, diversion, impoundment, or withdrawal;

install corrective controls or control works; and

seek enforcement of the order by filing an action in the superior court.

A person who violates an order issued under AS

46.15.180

is liable for all costs of removal, abatement, or installation and for court costs and attorney fees incurred by the state in seeking enforcement of the order.

History.

(§ 7 ch 135 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For enforcement, see 11 AAC 93, art. 6.

For critical water management areas, see 11 AAC 93, art. 9.

Sec. 46.15.256.
Data collection authority.

To carry out the provisions of this chapter, the commissioner may

inspect books, records, meters, gauges, well logs, works of appropriation, diversion, impoundment, withdrawal, or control and other relevant information or physical condition;

enter private property at all reasonable times after obtaining a search warrant from a judicial officer if the owner refuses consent to entry; and

compel the production of relevant information by a subpoena or subpoena duces tecum signed by the commissioner if the commissioner reasonably believes the information is necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History.

(§ 7 ch 135 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For appropriation and use of water, see 11 AAC 93, art. 2.

For enforcement, see 11 AAC 93, art. 6.

For critical water management areas, see 11 AAC 93, art. 9.

Sec. 46.15.260.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“appropriate” means to divert, impound, or withdraw a quantity of water from a source of water, for a beneficial use or to reserve water under AS

46.15.145

;

“appropriation” means the diversion, impounding, or withdrawal of a quantity of water from a source of water for a beneficial use or the reservation of water under AS

46.15.145

;

“beneficial use” means a use of water for the benefit of the appropriator, other persons or the public, that is reasonable and consistent with the public interest, including, but not limited to, domestic, agricultural, irrigation, industrial, manufacturing, fish and shellfish processing, navigation and transportation, mining, power, public, sanitary, fish and wildlife, recreational uses, and maintenance of water quality;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of natural resources;

“director” means the director of the division of lands, Department of Natural Resources;

“mineral and medicinal water” means

water of a hot spring or spring with curative properties which has been reserved by the federal government under Public Land Order No. 399; and

geothermal fluid, as defined in AS

41.06.060

;

“person” includes an individual, partnership, association, public or private corporation, state agency, political subdivision of the state, and the United States;

“source of water” means a substantial quantity of water capable of being put to beneficial use;

“water” means all water of the state, surface and subsurface, occurring in a natural state, except mineral and medicinal water.

History.

(§ 1 ch 50 SLA 1966; am §§ 8 — 10 ch 84 SLA 1980; am §§ 10, 11 ch 175 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1987 to alphabetize the defined terms.

Sec. 46.15.270.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Alaska Water Use Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 50 SLA 1966)